District of Columbia statutes.
29-1116

Member’s resignation.

(a)

A member may resign as a member in accordance with the governing principles. In the absence of applicable governing principles, a member may resign at any time.

(b)

Unless the governing principles provide otherwise, resignation of a member shall not relieve the member from any unpaid capital contribution, dues, assessments, fees, or other obligation incurred or commitment made by the member before resignation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 20 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).